Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.8 The Good Samaritan Overdose Prevention Act [Expired.]

21-28.8-1.
Expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.8-2.
Expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.8-3.
Expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.8-4.
Expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.8-5.
Expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 263, § 1.